lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 11030 Y 2
SFX 11030 imšti imšo/566 . 351
SFX 11030 imštis imšosi/566 . 351

SFX 11031 Y 2
SFX 11031 imšti imšo/567 . 351
SFX 11031 imštis imšosi/567 . 351

SFX 11035 Y 2
SFX 11035 inti inti/544 . 349
SFX 11035 intis intis/544 . 349

SFX 11036 Y 2
SFX 11036 inti inti/545 . 349
SFX 11036 intis intis/545 . 349

SFX 11037 Y 2
SFX 11037 inti inti/546 . 349
SFX 11037 intis intis/546 . 349

SFX 11038 Y 2
SFX 11038 inti inti/547 . 349
SFX 11038 intis intis/547 . 349

SFX 11039 Y 2
SFX 11039 inti inti/548 . 349
SFX 11039 intis intis/548 . 349

SFX 11040 Y 2
SFX 11040 inti inti/549 . 349
SFX 11040 intis intis/549 . 349

SFX 11041 Y 2
SFX 11041 inti inti/550 . 349
SFX 11041 intis intis/550 . 349

SFX 11042 Y 2
SFX 11042 inti inti/551 . 349
SFX 11042 intis intis/551 . 349

SFX 11043 Y 2
SFX 11043 inti inti/552 . 349
SFX 11043 intis intis/552 . 349

SFX 11044 Y 2
SFX 11044 inti inti/553 . 349
SFX 11044 intis intis/553 . 349

SFX 11055 Y 2
SFX 11055 inti įsta/554 . 350
SFX 11055 intis įstasi/554 . 350

SFX 11056 Y 2
SFX 11056 inti įsta/555 . 350
SFX 11056 intis įstasi/555 . 350

SFX 11057 Y 2
SFX 11057 inti įsta/556 . 350
SFX 11057 intis įstasi/556 . 350

SFX 11058 Y 2
SFX 11058 inti įsta/557 . 350
SFX 11058 intis įstasi/557 . 350

SFX 11059 Y 2
SFX 11059 inti įsta/558 . 350
SFX 11059 intis įstasi/558 . 350

SFX 11060 Y 2
SFX 11060 inti įsta/559 . 350
SFX 11060 intis įstasi/559 . 350

SFX 11061 Y 2
SFX 11061 inti įsta/560 . 350
SFX 11061 intis įstasi/560 . 350

SFX 11062 Y 2
SFX 11062 inti įsta/561 . 350
SFX 11062 intis įstasi/561 . 350

SFX 11063 Y 2
SFX 11063 inti įsta/562 . 350
SFX 11063 intis įstasi/562 . 350

SFX 11073 Y 1
SFX 11073 inti įstie/563 . 350

SFX 11074 Y 1
SFX 11074 intis įstie/564 . 350

SFX 11075 Y 2
SFX 11075 inti ino/565 . 351
SFX 11075 intis inosi/565 . 351

SFX 11076 Y 2
SFX 11076 inti ino/566 . 351
SFX 11076 intis inosi/566 . 351

SFX 11077 Y 2
SFX 11077 inti ino/567 . 351
SFX 11077 intis inosi/567 . 351

SFX 11081 Y 2
SFX 11081 kti kti/544 . 349
SFX 11081 ktis ktis/544 . 349

SFX 11082 Y 2
SFX 11082 kti kti/545 . 349
SFX 11082 ktis ktis/545 . 349

SFX 11083 Y 2
SFX 11083 kti kti/546 . 349
SFX 11083 ktis ktis/546 . 349

SFX 11084 Y 2
SFX 11084 kti kti/547 . 349
SFX 11084 ktis ktis/547 . 349

SFX 11085 Y 2
SFX 11085 kti kti/548 . 349
SFX 11085 ktis ktis/548 . 349

SFX 11086 Y 2
SFX 11086 kti kti/549 . 349
SFX 11086 ktis ktis/549 . 349

SFX 11087 Y 2
SFX 11087 kti kti/550 . 349
SFX 11087 ktis ktis/550 . 349

SFX 11088 Y 2
SFX 11088 kti kti/551 . 349
SFX 11088 ktis ktis/551 . 349

SFX 11089 Y 2
SFX 11089 kti kti/552 . 349
SFX 11089 ktis ktis/552 . 349

SFX 11090 Y 2
SFX 11090 kti kti/553 . 349
SFX 11090 ktis ktis/553 . 349

SFX 11101 Y 2
SFX 11101 kti eka/554 . 350
SFX 11101 ktis ekasi/554 . 350

SFX 11102 Y 2
SFX 11102 kti eka/555 . 350
SFX 11102 ktis ekasi/555 . 350

SFX 11103 Y 2
SFX 11103 kti eka/556 . 350
SFX 11103 ktis ekasi/556 . 350

SFX 11104 Y 2
SFX 11104 kti eka/557 . 350
SFX 11104 ktis ekasi/557 . 350

SFX 11105 Y 2
SFX 11105 kti eka/558 . 350
SFX 11105 ktis ekasi/558 . 350

SFX 11106 Y 2
SFX 11106 kti eka/559 . 350
SFX 11106 ktis ekasi/559 . 350

SFX 11107 Y 2
SFX 11107 kti eka/560 . 350
SFX 11107 ktis ekasi/560 . 350

SFX 11108 Y 2
SFX 11108 kti eka/561 . 350
SFX 11108 ktis ekasi/561 . 350

SFX 11109 Y 2
SFX 11109 kti eka/562 . 350
SFX 11109 ktis ekasi/562 . 350

SFX 11119 Y 1
SFX 11119 kti ekie/563 . 350

SFX 11120 Y 1
SFX 11120 ktis ekie/564 . 350

SFX 11121 Y 2
SFX 11121 kti ko/565 . 351
SFX 11121 ktis kosi/565 . 351

SFX 11122 Y 2
SFX 11122 kti ko/566 . 351
SFX 11122 ktis kosi/566 . 351

SFX 11123 Y 2
SFX 11123 kti ko/567 . 351
SFX 11123 ktis kosi/567 . 351

SFX 11127 Y 2
SFX 11127 ogti ogti/544 . 349
SFX 11127 ogtis ogtis/544 . 349

SFX 11128 Y 2
SFX 11128 ogti ogti/545 . 349
SFX 11128 ogtis ogtis/545 . 349

SFX 11129 Y 2
SFX 11129 ogti ogti/546 . 349
SFX 11129 ogtis ogtis/546 . 349

SFX 11130 Y 2
SFX 11130 ogti ogti/547 . 349
SFX 11130 ogtis ogtis/547 . 349

SFX 11131 Y 2
SFX 11131 ogti ogti/548 . 349
SFX 11131 ogtis ogtis/548 . 349

SFX 11132 Y 2
SFX 11132 ogti ogti/549 . 349
SFX 11132 ogtis ogtis/549 . 349

SFX 11133 Y 2
SFX 11133 ogti ogti/550 . 349
SFX 11133 ogtis ogtis/550 . 349

SFX 11134 Y 2
SFX 11134 ogti ogti/551 . 349
SFX 11134 ogtis ogtis/551 . 349

SFX 11135 Y 2
SFX 11135 ogti ogti/552 . 349
SFX 11135 ogtis ogtis/552 . 349

SFX 11136 Y 2
SFX 11136 ogti ogti/553 . 349
SFX 11136 ogtis ogtis/553 . 349

SFX 11147 Y 2
SFX 11147 ogti agia/554 . 350
SFX 11147 ogtis agiasi/554 . 350

SFX 11148 Y 2
SFX 11148 ogti agia/555 . 350
SFX 11148 ogtis agiasi/555 . 350

SFX 11149 Y 2
SFX 11149 ogti agia/556 . 350
SFX 11149 ogtis agiasi/556 . 350

SFX 11150 Y 2
SFX 11150 ogti agia/557 . 350
SFX 11150 ogtis agiasi/557 . 350

SFX 11151 Y 2
SFX 11151 ogti agia/558 . 350
SFX 11151 ogtis agiasi/558 . 350

SFX 11152 Y 2
SFX 11152 ogti agia/559 . 350
SFX 11152 ogtis agiasi/559 . 350

SFX 11153 Y 2
SFX 11153 ogti agia/560 . 350
SFX 11153 ogtis agiasi/560 . 350

SFX 11154 Y 2
SFX 11154 ogti agia/561 . 350
SFX 11154 ogtis agiasi/561 . 350

SFX 11155 Y 2
SFX 11155 ogti agia/562 . 350
SFX 11155 ogtis agiasi/562 . 350

SFX 11165 Y 1
SFX 11165 ogti agie/563 . 350

SFX 11166 Y 1
SFX 11166 ogtis agie/564 . 350

SFX 11167 Y 2
SFX 11167 ogti ogė/565 . 351
SFX 11167 ogtis ogėsi/565 . 351

SFX 11168 Y 2
SFX 11168 ogti ogė/566 . 351
SFX 11168 ogtis ogėsi/566 . 351

SFX 11169 Y 2
SFX 11169 ogti ogė/567 . 351
SFX 11169 ogtis ogėsi/567 . 351

SFX 11173 Y 2
SFX 11173 tėti tėti/544 . 349
SFX 11173 tėtis tėtis/544 . 349

SFX 11174 Y 2
SFX 11174 tėti tėti/545 . 349
SFX 11174 tėtis tėtis/545 . 349

SFX 11175 Y 2
SFX 11175 tėti tėti/546 . 349
SFX 11175 tėtis tėtis/546 . 349

SFX 11176 Y 2
SFX 11176 tėti tėti/547 . 349
SFX 11176 tėtis tėtis/547 . 349

SFX 11177 Y 2
SFX 11177 tėti tėti/548 . 349
SFX 11177 tėtis tėtis/548 . 349

SFX 11178 Y 2
SFX 11178 tėti tėti/549 . 349
SFX 11178 tėtis tėtis/549 . 349

SFX 11179 Y 2
SFX 11179 tėti tėti/550 . 349
SFX 11179 tėtis tėtis/550 . 349

SFX 11180 Y 2
SFX 11180 tėti tėti/551 . 349
SFX 11180 tėtis tėtis/551 . 349

SFX 11181 Y 2
SFX 11181 tėti tėti/552 . 349
SFX 11181 tėtis tėtis/552 . 349

SFX 11182 Y 2
SFX 11182 tėti tėti/553 . 349
SFX 11182 tėtis tėtis/553 . 349

SFX 11193 Y 2
SFX 11193 tėti čia/554 . 350
SFX 11193 tėtis čiasi/554 . 350

SFX 11194 Y 2
SFX 11194 tėti čia/555 . 350
SFX 11194 tėtis čiasi/555 . 350

SFX 11195 Y 2
SFX 11195 tėti čia/556 . 350
SFX 11195 tėtis čiasi/556 . 350

SFX 11196 Y 2
SFX 11196 tėti čia/557 . 350
SFX 11196 tėtis čiasi/557 . 350

SFX 11197 Y 2
SFX 11197 tėti čia/558 . 350
SFX 11197 tėtis čiasi/558 . 350

SFX 11198 Y 2
SFX 11198 tėti čia/559 . 350
SFX 11198 tėtis čiasi/559 . 350

SFX 11199 Y 2
SFX 11199 tėti čia/560 . 350
SFX 11199 tėtis čiasi/560 . 350

SFX 11200 Y 2
SFX 11200 tėti čia/561 . 350
SFX 11200 tėtis čiasi/561 . 350

SFX 11201 Y 2
SFX 11201 tėti čia/562 . 350
SFX 11201 tėtis čiasi/562 . 350

SFX 11211 Y 1
SFX 11211 tėti tie/563 . 350

SFX 11212 Y 1
SFX 11212 tėtis tie/564 . 350

SFX 11213 Y 2
SFX 11213 tėti tėjo/565 . 351
SFX 11213 tėtis tėjosi/565 . 351

SFX 11214 Y 2
SFX 11214 tėti tėjo/566 . 351
SFX 11214 tėtis tėjosi/566 . 351

SFX 11215 Y 2
SFX 11215 tėti tėjo/567 . 351
SFX 11215 tėtis tėjosi/567 . 351

SFX 11219 Y 2
SFX 11219 uti uti/544 . 349
SFX 11219 utis utis/544 . 349

SFX 11220 Y 2
SFX 11220 uti uti/545 . 349
SFX 11220 utis utis/545 . 349

SFX 11221 Y 2
SFX 11221 uti uti/546 . 349
SFX 11221 utis utis/546 . 349

SFX 11222 Y 2
SFX 11222 uti uti/547 . 349
SFX 11222 utis utis/547 . 349

SFX 11223 Y 2
SFX 11223 uti uti/548 . 349
SFX 11223 utis utis/548 . 349

SFX 11224 Y 2
SFX 11224 uti uti/549 . 349
SFX 11224 utis utis/549 . 349

SFX 11225 Y 2
SFX 11225 uti uti/550 . 349
SFX 11225 utis utis/550 . 349

SFX 11226 Y 2
SFX 11226 uti uti/551 . 349
SFX 11226 utis utis/551 . 349

SFX 11227 Y 2
SFX 11227 uti uti/552 . 349
SFX 11227 utis utis/552 . 349

SFX 11228 Y 2
SFX 11228 uti uti/553 . 349
SFX 11228 utis utis/553 . 349

AF 11219,11220,11239,11259,65521 # 126
AF 11035,11036,11055,11075,65521 # 189
AF 11127,11128,11147,11167,65521 # 200
AF 11173,11174,11193,11213,65521 # 234
AF 11081,11082,11101,11121,65521 # 241
AF 11035,11036,11044,11055,11063,11075,11077,65521 # 441
