lt_LT.dic
apauti/126	12
apsiauti/126	14
apvogti/200	12
atkentėti/234	12
atpažinti/189	12
atsilikti/241	14
auti/126	12
autis/126	14
beatlikti/241	12
beatpažinti/189	12
belikti/241	12
bepalikti/241	12
bepažinti/189	12
bevogti/200	12
išauti/126	12
iškentėti/234	12
išlikti/241	12
išpažinti/189	12
išsiauti/126	14
išvogti/200	12
kentėti/234	12
likti/241	12
liktis/241	14
neapauti/126	34
neapsiauti/126	35
neapsipažinti/189	35
neapsivogti/200	35
neapvogti/200	34
neatkentėti/234	34
neatlikti/241	34
neatpažinti/189	34
neauti/126	34
nebeapsiauti/126	35
nebeatlikti/241	34
nebeatpažinti/189	34
nebeiškentėti/234	34
nebeišlikti/241	34
nebeišvogti/200	34
nebekentėti/234	34
nebenukentėti/234	34
nebenusiauti/126	35
nebepalikti/241	34
nebepavogti/200	34
nebepažinti/189	34
nebepripažinti/189	34
nebeprisipažinti/189	35
nebesiauti/126	35
nebesusipažinti/189	35
nebeužsilikti/241	35
nebevogti/200	34
neiškentėti/234	34
neišpažinti/189	34
neišvogti/200	34
nekentėti/234	34
nelikti/241	34
nenuauti/126	34
nenukentėti/234	34
nenusiauti/126	35
nenuvogti/200	34
nepakentėti/234	34
nepasilikti/241	35
nepasivogti/200	35
nepavogti/200	34
nepažinti/441	34
neperkentėti/234	34
nepersiauti/126	35
neprasivogti/200	35
nepripažinti/189	34
neprisikentėti/234	35
neprisipažinti/189	35
neprisivogti/200	35
neprivogti/200	34
nesiauti/126	35
nesusipažinti/189	35
nevogti/200	34
nuauti/126	12
nukentėti/234	12
nusiauti/126	14
nuvogti/200	12
pakentėti/234	12
palikti/241	12
pasivogti/200	14
pažinti/189	12
perkentėti/234	12
persiauti/126	14
prakentėti/234	12
prasivogti/200	14
prikentėti/234	12
pripažinti/189	12
prisikentėti/234	14
privogti/200	12
susipažinti/189	14
teapsiauti/126	14
teatlikti/241	12
tebeatlikti/241	12
tebeišlikti/241	12
tebekentėti/234	12
tebepalikti/241	12
tebepažinti/189	12
tebevogti/200	12
teiškentėti/234	12
teišpažinti/189	12
telikti/241	12
tenepalikti/241	34
tenukentėti/234	12
tepakentėti/234	12
tepalikti/241	12
tepripažinti/189	12
tesusipažinti/189	14
tevogti/200	12
užsiauti/126	14
užsilikti/241	14
įsiauti/126	14
įsivogti/200	14
